District of Columbia statutes.
44-151.17

Rulemaking authority; reasonable time to comply with rules.

(a)

The Mayor may promulgate rules to carry out and enforce the provisions of this chapter.

(b)

Any provider who is offering continuing care shall be given a reasonable time, not to exceed one year from the date of publication of any applicable rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter, within which to comply with the rules and to obtain a license.

Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-270, § 117, 52 DCR 799